src/fst/morphology/affixes/adverbs.lexc
!! # Adverb inflection
!! ----
!! Komi adverbs inflect for direction.


LEXICON ADV-ADA_
+AdA: WordEnd ;
LEXICON Ad-ATAG ! these are checked as advs.
ADV-ADA_ ;

!LEXICON GER_
!+V+Ger: ADV_ ;

LEXICON ADV-MULT_
+Mult: K ;
LEXICON ADV-MULT-DIST_
+Mult+Dist: K ;
LEXICON ADV-ORD-MULT_
+Ord+Mult: K ;

LEXICON ADV_IS_SUPERL
+Superl: K ;
+Superl+Der/моз:%>моз K ;
+Superl+Der/CompMod:%>кодь K ;

LEXICON ADV_IS_SUPERL_ELA
+Superl+Ela: K ;
LEXICON ADV_IS_SUPERL_ILL
+Superl+Ill: K ;
LEXICON ADV_IS_SUPERL_INE
+Superl+Ine: K ;

LEXICON ADV-IS_GER-IGON ! these are checked as gerunds in +Der/иг
+V+Der/иг+Ins: ADV_ ;

!LEXICON ADV-IS_GER-IGTYRJI ! these are checked as gerunds in +Der/иг
!+V+Der/иг+Der/тырйи: ADV_ ;

LEXICON ADV-IS_GER-MON ! these are checked as gerunds in +Der/мӧн
+V+Der/мӧн: ADV_ ;

LEXICON ADV-IS_GER-TOG ! these are checked as gerunds in +Der/тӧг
+V+Der/тӧг: ADV_ ;

LEXICON ADV-IS_GER-TODZ ! these are checked as gerunds in +Der/тӧдз
+V+Der/тӧдз: ADV_ ;

LEXICON ADV-IS_N-TOG ! these are checked as state adverbials in +Der/тӧг
+N+Der/тӧг: ADV_ ;

LEXICON ADV-IS_ADV-TOG ! polar adverbials in +Der/тӧг
+Der/тӧг: ADV_ ;

LEXICON ADV-IS_Q-TOG ! polar adverbials in +Der/тӧг
+Qnt+Der/тӧг: ADV_ ;

LEXICON ADV-IS_SUPERL !
+Der/мед: ADV_ ;

LEXICON ADV-F !
+Src/F: ADV_ ;

LEXICON ADV-STATE !
+State: COMPARATIVE ; !

LEXICON AdvParenthetic
+Parenthetic: WordEnd ;

LEXICON ADV_SUB
+Err/Orth: ADV_ ;

LEXICON ADV_ ! these are checked as advs.
: COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON AdvTemp
 ADV-TEMP_ ;

LEXICON ADV-TEMP_
+Temp: COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV-SPAT  !!= * **@CODE@**
      !! these are adverbs in spatial cases
      !! and they probably are equivalent in morphology to postpositions
 ADV-SPAT-APR ; !
 ADV-SPAT-APRILL ; !
 ADV-SPAT-APRINE ; !
 ADV-SPAT-APRELA ; !
 ADV-SPAT-EGR ;	 !
 ADV-SPAT-ELA ;	 !
 ADV-SPAT-ILL ;	 !
 ADV-SPAT-INE ;	 !
 ADV-SPAT-PRL ;	 !
 ADV-SPAT-TERI ;	 !
 ADV-SPAT-TERII ;	 !
! ADV-SPAT-TRA ;	 !

LEXICON ADV-SPAT-LA ! These adverbs have a formative in ла
+Der/ла: ADV-SPAT ;

LEXICON ADV-SPAT-APR
+Spat+Apr:%>лань SPAT-COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV-SPAT-APRELA
+Spat+Apr:%>ланьысь SPAT-COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV-SPAT-APRILL
+Spat+Apr:%>ланьӧ SPAT-COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV-SPAT-APRINE
+Spat+Apr:%>ланьын SPAT-COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV-SPAT-EGR
+Spat+Egr:%>сянь SPAT-COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV-SPAT-ELA
+Spat+Ela:%>ысь SPAT-COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV-SPAT-ILL
+Spat+Ill:%>ӧ SPAT-COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV-SPAT-INE
+Spat+Ine:%>ын SPAT-COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV-SPAT-PRL
+Spat+Prl:%>ӧт K ;

!LEXICON ADV-SPAT-TRA
!+Spat+Tra:%>ті COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV-SPAT-TERI
+Spat+TerI:%>ӧдзз COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV-SPAT-TERII
+Spat+TerII:%>ви COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV-VTERI
+V+Der/тӧдз+Adv+Temp+TerI:%>тӧдзз K ;

! Adverbs with ready morphology
!LEXICON ADV-IS_APRELA
!+Apr+Ela: SPAT-COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV-IS_APRILL
+Apr+Ill: SPAT-COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV-IS_APRINE
+Apr+Ine: SPAT-COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV-IS_APR
+Apr: SPAT-COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV-IS_EGR
+Egr: SPAT-COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV-IS_ELA
+Ela: SPAT-COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV-IS_ILL
+Ill: IllCompar ;

LEXICON ADV-IS_INE
+Ine: SPAT-COMPARATIVE ;

LEXICON ADV-IS_PROL
+Prol: K ;

LEXICON ADV-IS_TERI
+TerI: K ;

!LEXICON ADV-IS_TERII
!+TerII: K ;

!LEXICON ADV-IS_TRA
!+Tra: K ;



! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
